District of Columbia statutes.
42-1902.05

Recordation of condominium instruments; amendment and certification thereof.

All amendments and certifications of the condominium instruments shall set forth the instrument number and date of recordation of the declaration and, when necessary, shall set forth the condominium book and page number where the plats and plans are recorded. All condominium instruments and all amendments and certifications thereof shall set forth the name and address of the condominium and shall be so recorded. The Recorder of Deeds shall accept for recordation any executed and acknowledged condominium instrument or any executed and acknowledged amendment and certification without further review of a condominium instrument or the imposition of any additional requirement.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title II, § 205, 23 DCR 9532b
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-233, § 2(k), 38 DCR 261

Cross References

Bylaws and declaration copies for purchasers, see § 42-1904.10.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-1904.10.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1815.
1973 Ed., § 5-1215.